Hawaii statutes.
§333E-3 State council on developmental
disabilities. The state council on developmental disabilities (hereinafter
referred to as the council) shall be placed in the department of health for
administrative purposes only and assigned the following responsibilities:

(1) Planning. The state council shall:

(A) Develop, prepare, adopt, and periodically
review and revise, as necessary, the state plan for individuals with
developmental disabilities (hereinafter called the state plan) in conformance
with federal substantive and procedural requirements therefor. The state plan
shall guide the development and delivery of all services to individuals with
developmental disabilities. The state council shall transmit the state plan to
the governor for approval, and upon approval shall be submitted to the federal
government for appropriate approval. The state plan and revisions thereto
shall be effective upon the governor's approval thereof. The state plan shall
include establishment of goals and priorities of the State in meeting the needs
of individuals with developmental disabilities, including the recommendation of
priorities for the distribution of public funds for comprehensive services to
individuals with developmental disabilities within the State and other matters
deemed necessary to achieve productivity, integration, inclusion,
self-determination, and independence of individuals with developmental
disabilities. The state plan shall guide the coordinated delivery and
establishment of comprehensive services, facilities, and programs for
individuals with developmental disabilities;

(B) Review and comment upon implementation
plans prepared and carried out by the various departments of the State in
carrying out the state plan for individuals with developmental disabilities;
and

(C) Review and comment upon any other state
plans which affect services to individuals with developmental disabilities;

(2) Coordination of departments and private
agencies. The council shall:

(A) Identify services duplicated by departments
and private agencies and coordinate and assist in the elimination of
unnecessary duplication;

(B) Encourage efficient and coordinated use
of federal, state, and private resources in the provision of services;

(C) Recommend areas of responsibility for
services to both public and private agencies serving individuals with
developmental disabilities, reviewing designations as necessary. Identify gaps
in services to individuals with developmental disabilities and coordinate
responsibilities of various public or private agencies for such missing
services; and

(D) Ensure that implementation planning by
the various departments is effectively coordinated and that interdepartmental
programs receive the full support of all departments involved;

(3) Evaluation. The council shall:

(A) Monitor, evaluate, and comment upon
implementation plans of the various public and private agencies for individuals
with developmental disabilities;

(B) Monitor all ongoing projects relating to
developmental disabilities of the various public and private agencies;

(C) Participate in the planning, design, or
redesign, and monitoring of state quality assurance systems that affect
individuals with developmental disabilities;

(4) Advocacy. The council shall:

(A) Advocate for the needs of individuals
with developmental disabilities before the legislature and the public and to
the governor;

(B) Act in an advisory capacity to the
governor, the legislature, and all concerned department heads on all issues
affecting individuals with developmental disabilities; and

(C) Support and conduct outreach activities
to identify individuals with developmental disabilities and their families to
obtain services, individualized supports, and other forms of assistance,
including access to special adaptation of generic community services or
specialized services; and

(5) Report. The council shall:

(A) Prepare and submit reports to the
governor, the legislature, and all concerned department heads on the
implementation of the state plan;

(B) Prepare and submit to the United States
Secretary of Health and Human Services, through the governor, any periodic
reports the Secretary may reasonably request; and

(C) Prepare other reports necessary to
accomplish its duties under this chapter. [L 1975, c 198, §3; am L 1976, c 201,
§2; am L 1979, c 180, pt of §1; am L 1980, c 232, §17; am L 2001, c 175, §3]

Cross References

Annual reports, see §93-12.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next